Utah statutes.
77-18-15.   Retention of expunged records -- Agencies.
(1)  The division shall keep, index, and maintain all expunged records of
arrests and convictions.
(2)  Employees of the division may not divulge any information contained in
its index to any person or agency without a court order, except to the
following:
(a)  the Board of Pardons and Parole;
(b)  the Peace Officer Standards and Training;
(c)  federal authorities, unless prohibited by federal law;
(d)  the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing; and
(e)  the State Office of Education.
(3)  The division may also use the information in its index for the purpose of
establishing good character for issuance of a concealed firearm permit as
provided in Section 53-5-704.
(4)  A person whose records are released under Subsection (2) shall be given a
reasonable opportunity by the recipient agency to challenge and explain any
information in the records and to challenge the relevancy of that information
before a final determination is made by the agency.
(5)  A court may permit inspection or release of an expunged record only upon
petition by the person who is the subject of the record and only to the
persons named in the petition.
(6) (a)  For judicial sentencing, a court may order any records sealed under
this section to be opened and admitted into evidence.
(b)  The records are confidential and are available for inspection only by the
court, parties, counsel for the parties, and any other person who is
authorized by the court to inspect them.
(c)  At the end of the action or proceeding, the court shall order the records
sealed again.
(7)  Records released under this section are classified as protected under
Section 63G-2-305 and are accessible only as provided under Title 63G, Chapter
2, Part 2, Access to Records.
